Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS APPLYING TO HEALTH PROFESSIONS GENERALLY

CHAPTER 113. MENTAL HEALTH TELEMEDICINE AND TELEHEALTH SERVICES

Sec. 113.001. DEFINITIONS. The definitions provided by Section 111.001 apply to this chapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 4455), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 113.002. PATIENT LOCATED OUTSIDE OF STATE. Notwithstanding any other law, a health professional may provide a mental health service that is within the scope of the professional's license, certification, or authorization through the use of a telemedicine medical service or a telehealth service to a patient who is located outside of this state, subject to any applicable regulation of the jurisdiction in which the patient is located.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 4455), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.